src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-ettshom_gt-norm.yaml
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: эттшӧммезӧ
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: эттшӧммезӧс
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: эттшӧммезӧлӧн
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: эттшӧммезӧлісь
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: эттшӧммезӧлӧ
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: эттшӧммезнам 
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxSg1: эттшӧммезӧкӧт
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезӧтӧг, эттшӧммезтӧгьям]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: эттшӧммезӧла
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: эттшӧммезӧся
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: эттшӧммезам
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: [эттшӧммесим, эттшӧммезсим]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: эттшӧммезам
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезӧлань, этшшӧммезланям]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезӧсянь, эттшӧммезсяням]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезӧттям, эттшӧммезӧттим]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезӧдззам, эттшӧммезӧдззим]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxSg1: эттшӧммезӧви
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезланям, эттшӧммезӧланьын]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезланьсим, эттшӧммезӧланись]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезланям, эттшӧммезӧланьӧ]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезӧланьсянь, эттшӧммезланьсяням]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезӧланьӧт, эттшӧммезланьӧттям, эттшӧммезланьӧттим]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg1: [эттшӧммезӧланьӧдз, эттшӧммезланьӧдззам, эттшӧммезланьӧдззим]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg1: эттшӧммезӧланьви 


    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [эттшӧммет, эттшӧммезыт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметӧ, эттшӧммезтӧ]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметлӧн, эттшӧммезытлӧн]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметлісь, эттшӧммезытлісь]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметлӧ, эттшӧммезытлӧ]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: эттшӧммезнат 
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметкӧт, эттшӧммезыткӧт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметтӧг, эттшӧммезыттӧг, эттшӧммезтӧгьят]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметла, эттшӧммезытла]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [эттшӧммется, эттшӧммезытся]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: эттшӧммезат
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [эттшӧммесит, эттшӧммезсит]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: эттшӧммезат
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметлань, эттшӧммезытлань, этшшӧммезланят]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметсянь, эттшӧммезытсянь, эттшӧммезсянят]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [эттшӧммезӧттят, эттшӧммезӧттит]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxSg2: [эттшӧммезӧдззат, эттшӧммезӧдззит]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметви, эттшӧммезытви]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: [эттшӧммезланят, эттшӧмметланьын, эттшӧммезытланьын]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: [эттшӧммезланьсит, эттшӧмметланись, эттшӧммезытланись]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: [эттшӧммезланят, эттшӧмметланьӧ, эттшӧммезытланьӧ]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметланьсянь, эттшӧммезытланьсянь, эттшӧммезланьсянят]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметланьӧт, эттшӧммезытланьӧт, эттшӧммезланьӧттят, эттшӧммезланьӧттит]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметланьӧдз, эттшӧммезытланьӧдз, эттшӧммезланьӧдззат, эттшӧммезланьӧдззит]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [эттшӧмметланьви, эттшӧммезытланьви] 


    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [эттшӧммес, эттшӧммезыс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [эттшӧммесӧ, эттшӧммезсӧ]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [эттшӧммеслӧн, эттшӧммезыслӧн]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [эттшӧммеслісь, эттшӧммезыслісь]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [эттшӧммеслӧ, эттшӧммезыслӧ]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: эттшӧммезнас 
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [эттшӧммескӧт, эттшӧммезыскӧт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [эттшӧмместӧг, эттшӧммезыстӧг, эттшӧммезтӧгьяс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [эттшӧммесла, эттшӧммезысла]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [эттшӧммесся, эттшӧммезысся]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: эттшӧммезас
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [эттшӧммесис, эттшӧммезсис]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: эттшӧммезас
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [эттшӧммеслань, эттшӧммезыслань, этшшӧммезланяс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [эттшӧммессянь, эттшӧммезыссянь, эттшӧммезсяняс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [эттшӧммезӧттяс, эттшӧммезӧттис]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [эттшӧммезӧдззас, эттшӧммезӧдззис]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: [эттшӧммесви, эттшӧммезысви]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: [эттшӧммезланяс, эттшӧммесланьын, эттшӧммезысланьын]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: [эттшӧммезланьсис, эттшӧммесланись, эттшӧммезысланись]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: [эттшӧммезланяс, эттшӧммесланьӧ, эттшӧммезысланьӧ]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [эттшӧммесланьсянь, эттшӧммезысланьсянь, эттшӧммезланьсяняс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [эттшӧммесланьӧт, эттшӧммезысланьӧт, эттшӧммезланьӧттяс, эттшӧммезланьӧттис]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [эттшӧммесланьӧдз, эттшӧммезысланьӧдз, эттшӧммезланьӧдззас, эттшӧммезланьӧдззис]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: [эттшӧммесланьви, эттшӧммезысланьви]

 
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: эттшӧммезным
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: эттшӧммезнымӧс
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: эттшӧммезнымлӧн
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: эттшӧммезнымлісь
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: эттшӧммезнымлӧ
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: эттшӧммезнаным 
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxPl1: эттшӧммезнымкӧт
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезнымтӧг, эттшӧммезтӧгьяным]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: эттшӧммезнымла
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: эттшӧммезнымся
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: эттшӧммезаным
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [эттшӧммесиным, эттшӧммезсиным]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: эттшӧммезаным
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезнымлань, этшшӧммезланяным]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезнымсянь, эттшӧммезсяняным]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезӧттяным, эттшӧммезӧттиным]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезӧдззаным, эттшӧммезӧдззиным]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: эттшӧммезнымви
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезланяным, эттшӧммезнымланьын]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезланьсиным, эттшӧммезнымланись]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезланяным, эттшӧммезнымланьӧ]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезнымланьсянь, эттшӧммезланьсяняным]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезнымланьӧт, эттшӧммезланьӧттяным, эттшӧммезланьӧттиным]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [эттшӧммезнымланьӧдз, эттшӧммезланьӧдззаным, эттшӧммезланьӧдззиным]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: эттшӧммезнымланьви 


    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: эттшӧммезныт
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: эттшӧммезнытӧ
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: эттшӧммезнытлӧн
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: эттшӧммезнытлісь
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: эттшӧммезнытлӧ
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: эттшӧммезнаныт 
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxPl2: эттшӧммезныткӧт
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезныттӧг, эттшӧммезтӧгьяныт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: эттшӧммезнытла
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: эттшӧммезнытся
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: эттшӧммезаныт
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [эттшӧммесиныт, эттшӧммезсиныт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: эттшӧммезаныт
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезнытлань, этшшӧммезланяныт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезнытсянь, эттшӧммезсяняныт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезӧттяныт, эттшӧммезӧттиныт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезӧдззаныт, эттшӧммезӧдззиныт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: эттшӧммезнытви
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезланяныт, эттшӧммезнытланьын]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезланьсиныт, эттшӧммезнытланись]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезланяныт, эттшӧммезнытланьӧ]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезнытланьсянь, эттшӧммезланьсяняныт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезнытланьӧт, эттшӧммезланьӧттяныт, эттшӧммезланьӧттиныт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [эттшӧммезнытланьӧдз, эттшӧммезланьӧдззаныт, эттшӧммезланьӧдззиныт]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: эттшӧммезнытланьви 


    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: эттшӧммезныс
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: эттшӧммезнысӧ
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: эттшӧммезныслӧн
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: эттшӧммезныслісь
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: эттшӧммезныслӧ
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: эттшӧммезнаныс 
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxPl3: эттшӧммезныскӧт
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезныстӧг, эттшӧммезтӧгьяныс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: эттшӧммезнысла
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: эттшӧммезнысся
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: эттшӧммезаныс
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [эттшӧммесиныс, эттшӧммезсиныс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: эттшӧммезаныс
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезныслань, этшшӧммезланяныс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезныссянь, эттшӧммезсяняныс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезӧттяныс, эттшӧммезӧттиныс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезӧдззаныс, эттшӧммезӧдззиныс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: эттшӧммезнысви
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезланяныс, эттшӧммезнысланьын]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезланьсиныс, эттшӧммезнысланись]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезланяныс, эттшӧммезнысланьӧ]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезнысланьсянь, эттшӧммезланьсяняныс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезнысланьӧт, эттшӧммезланьӧттяныс, эттшӧммезланьӧттиныс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [эттшӧммезнысланьӧдз, эттшӧммезланьӧдззаныс, эттшӧммезланьӧдззиныс]
    эттшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: эттшӧммезнысланьви 
